Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2308
Sections; exemptions.

Nothing contained in sections 18-2301 to 18-2315 shall be construed to prohibit a homeowner from personally performing air conditioning air distribution work on the property in which the homeowner resides, and the homeowner will not be required to have a certificate of competency to do such work, but the work must conform to the rules and regulations set forth by the city council or village board of trustees for such work as provided by sections 18-2301 to 18-2315.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 8, p. 471;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 152.